Hawaii, session 2026, GM1328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that numerous species in
the State are on the brink of extinction, in particular many
indigenous birds found nowhere else in the world. While the
State has made progress in addressing the myriad causes
contributing to extinction, the legislature finds that existing
efforts must be supplemented to prevent further loss of
biodiversity.
The legislature recognizes that Zealandia (Te Mara a Tane)
is a pioneering conservation sanctuary in Wellington, New
Zealand, best known for proving how dramatically nature can
rebound with proper protection. Built as a fully fenced,
predator-excluded sanctuary, Zealandia creates a safe haven
where native birds, reptiles, and plants thrive and recover in
near-natural habitats, safe from invasive predators and vectors.
This model has not only enabled the reintroduction and rapid
growth of iconic native species that were once on the brink of
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO. --
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
extinction, but it has also transformed the valley into a living
example of ecosystem restoration in a modern city.
Just as importantly, Zealandia's impact extends beyond its
fence line: thriving populations disperse outward into
surrounding neighborhoods and green spaces, helping native
wildlife return to the wider region. Zealandia also facilitates
community engagement by welcoming volunteers, residents,
researchers, and visitors, and serving as a hub for school
programs and hands-on learning. Its success in engaging the
community and visitors has helped Zealandia become largely
self-funded through admissions, memberships, tours, and
experiences that reinvest directly into conservation.
The legislature also recognizes that successful sanctuary
models in the United States generate substantial revenue for
conservation efforts. They serve as educational centers for
local schools and visitor destinations and provide critical
habitats for endangered and other species. The State's climate
and environment provide more diverse habitats for wildlife than
found elsewhere in the continental United States. With
appropriate considerations and protections to ensure no adverse
impact on the state environment, the State can improve the
2026-2493 SB3253 GDI SMA-l.docx
iiniiimniiiiBiMNiHMH

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
living conditions of rescued animals from other states and
generate significant revenue for state conservation efforts.
The legislature believes that the State is uniquely
positioned to become a national center for endangered species
research, education, and protection. Establishing sanctuaries
in the State like those that have proven successful elsewhere
can advance the State's position as the premier place for
endangered species work and conservation and create pathways for
local education, jobs, investment, and research.
The legislature also believes that successful nonprofit
models for the establishment and operation of specialized models
of endangered species sanctuaries are an efficient and
preferable way to supplement broader government-run efforts and
programs. The nonprofit models provide more flexibility and
adaptability for management, operations, innovation, and
community engagement.
The legislature further finds that the establishment of a
nonprofit entity to create and manage endangered species
sanctuaries and exempting appropriations of state funds to the
entity from the requirements of chapter 42F, Hawaii Revised
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 3

Page 4
S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
Statutes, complies with the public purpose requirements of
article VII, section 4, of the Hawaii State Constitution.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to enable
additional support for the State's conservation efforts through
recognizing a nonprofit entity established pursuant to senate
resolution 94, senate draft 1, regular session of 2026, to
create and manage endangered species sanctuaries.
SECTION 2. Chapter 195D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§195D- Hawaii conservation sanctuary. (a) There
shall be recognized by the State the Hawaii conservation
sanctuary, which shall be a nonprofit organization established
pursuant to senate resolution 94, senate draft 1, regular
session of 2026, to enhance and support the work of conservation
and endangered species and wildlife preservation, and to oversee
related and ancillary programs. The official designation of the
Hawaii conservation sanctuary shall be the State of Hawaii
Conservation Sanctuary.
(b) The Hawaii conservation sanctuary shall protect and
expand populations of endangered species and other wildlife
2026-2493 SB3253 GDI SMA-l.docx
■liiiiHiiiniMMiinnH

Page 5
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
within the State by developing and operating conservation
sanctuaries in the State, including;
(1) One around a recreational body of water;
(2) One in an area appropriate for the protection of
native birds and other species; and
(3) One in an area appropriate for the protection of
rescue animals and larger species of wildlife.
(c) The Hawaii conservation sanctuary may;
(1) Operate for-profit business enterprises;
(2) Hold or lease property;
n (3) Enter into contracts to support its mission; and
(4) Provide for on-site visitor access and accommodation
as it deems appropriate to support its mission.
(d)' The Hawaii conservation sanctuary may operate within
an agricultural district. The operations of the Hawaii
conservation sanctuary authorized pursuant to subsections (b)
and (c) shall be deemed permissible uses pursuant to sections
205-2(d) and 205-4.5.
(e) The qualifying standards and conditions related to the
receipt of funds contained in chapter 42F shall not apply to
state funds received by the Hawaii conservation sanctuary;
2026-2493 SB3253 GDI SMA-l.docx
lOiniRIIIIIIIIIHIHilMIIIIIIIIII

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
provided that if the Hawaii conservation sanctuary in turn
contracts with a recipient or provider, then the qualifying
standards, conditions, and other provisions of chapter 42F shall
apply to the recipient or provider and the contract.
(f) Two seats on the governing board of the Hawaii
conservation sanctuary shall be reserved for representatives of
the State.
(g) The department shall assist the Hawaii conservation
sanctuary with identifying and accessing appropriate land to
support its mission.”
SECTION 3. Section 205-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (d) to read as follows:
"(d) Agricultural districts shall include:
(1) Activities or uses as characterized by the cultivation
of crops, crops for bioenergy, orchards, forage, and
forestry;
(2) Farming activities or uses related to animal husbandry
and game and fish propagation;
(3) Aquaculture, which means the production of aquatic
plant and animal life within ponds and other bodies of
water;
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 6

Page 7
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(4) Wind-generated energy production for public, private,
and commercial use;
(5) Biofuel production, as described in section
205-4.5 (a) (16), for public, private, and commercial
use;
(6) Solar energy facilities; provided that:
(A) This paragraph shall apply only to land with soil
classified by the land study bureau's detailed
land classification as overall (master)
productivity rating class B, C, D, or E; and
(B) Solar energy facilities placed within land with
soil classified as overall productivity rating
class B or C shall not occupy more than ten per
cent of the acreage of the parcel, or twenty
acres of land, whichever is lesser, unless a
special use permit is granted pursuant to section
205-6;
(7) Bona fide agricultural services and uses that support
the agricultural activities of the fee or leasehold
owner of the property and accessory to any of the
above activities, regardless of whether conducted on
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 7
NimHiMniiiiiiiinniiiii

Page 8 S.B. NO. ““2
C.D. 1
the same premises as the agricultural activities to
which they are accessory, including farm dwellings as
defined in section 205-4.5 (a) (4), employee housing,
farm buildings, mills, storage facilities, processing
facilities, photovoltaic, biogas, and other
small-scale renewable energy systems producing energy
solely for use in the agricultural activities of the
fee or leasehold owner of the property,
agricultural-energy facilities as defined in section
205-4.5 (a) (17), vehicle and equipment storage areas,
and plantation community subdivisions as defined in
section 205-4.5 (a) (12);
(8) Wind machines and wind farms;
(9) Small-scale meteorological, air quality, noise, and
other scientific and environmental data collection and
monitoring facilities occupying less than one-half
acre of land; provided that these facilities shall not
be used as or equipped for use as living quarters or
dwellings;
(10) Agricultural parks;
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 8

Page 9
S.B. NO. "’2
C.D. 1
(11) Agricultural tourism conducted on a working farm, or a
farming operation as defined in section 165-2, for the
enjoyment, education, or involvement of visitors;
provided that the agricultural tourism activity is
accessory and secondary to the principal agricultural
use and does not interfere with surrounding farm
operations; provided further that this paragraph shall
apply only to a county that has adopted ordinances
regulating agricultural tourism under section 205-5;
(12) Agricultural tourism activities, including overnight
accommodations of twenty-one days or less, for any one
stay within a county; provided that this paragraph
shall apply only to a county that includes at least
three islands and has adopted ordinances regulating
agricultural tourism activities pursuant to section
205-5; provided further that the agricultural tourism
activities coexist with a bona fide agricultural
activity. For the purposes of this paragraph, "bona
fide agricultural activity" means a farming operation
as defined in section 165-2;
(13) Open area recreational facilities;
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx

S.B. NO.
sr”
C.D. 1
(14) Geothermal resources exploration and geothermal
resources development, as defined under section 182-1;
(15) Agricultural-based commercial operations registered in
Hawaii, including:
(A) A roadside stand that is not an enclosed
structure, owned and operated by a producer for
the display and sale of agricultural products
grown in Hawaii and value-added products that
were produced using agricultural products grown
in Hawaii;
(B) Retail activities in an enclosed structure owned
and operated by a producer for the display and
sale of agricultural products grown in Hawaii,
value-added products that were produced using
agricultural products grown in Hawaii, logo items
related to the producer's agricultural
operations, and other food items;
(C) A retail food establishment owned and operated by
a producer and permitted under chapter 11-50,
Hawaii administrative rules, that prepares and
serves food at retail using products grown in
2026-2493 SB3253 GDI SMA-l.docx 1

Page 11
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
Hawaii and value-added products that were
produced using agricultural products grown in
Hawaii;
(D) A farmers' market, which is an outdoor market
limited to producers selling agricultural
products grown in Hawaii and value-added products
that were produced using agricultural products
grown in Hawaii; and
(E) A food hub, which is a facility that may contain
a commercial kitchen and provides for the
storage, processing, distribution, and sale of
agricultural products grown in Hawaii and value-
added products that were produced using
agricultural products grown in Hawaii.
The owner of an agricultural-based commercial
operation shall certify, upon request of an officer or
agent charged with enforcement of this chapter under
section 205-12, that the agricultural products
displayed or sold by the operation meet the
requirements of this paragraph;
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 11

Page 12 3253
S.B. NO.
S.D.2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(16) Hydroelectric facilities as described in section
205-4.5 (a) (23); [aftd]
(17) Composting and co-composting operations; provided that
operations that process their own green waste and do
not reguire permits from the department of health
shall use the finished composting product only on the
operation's own premises to minimize the potential
spread of invasive species[—]; and
(18) Operations of the Hawaii conservation sanctuary
authorized pursuant to section 195D-
Agricultural districts shall not include golf courses and golf
driving ranges, except as provided in section 205-4.5(d). No
landfill unit, as defined in section 342H-52, shall be located
on land within the agricultural district that has soil
classified by the land study bureau's detailed land
classification as overall (master) productivity rating class A
in a county with a population greater than five hundred
thousand. Agricultural districts include areas that are not
used for, or that are not suited to, agricultural and ancillary
activities by reason of topography, soils, and other related
characteristics."
2026-2493 SB3253 GDI SMA-l.docx 12

Page 13
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
SECTION 4. Section 205-4.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
"(a) Within the agricultural district, all lands with soil
classified by the land study bureau's detailed land
classification as overall (master) productivity rating class A
or B and for solar energy facilities, class B or C, shall be
restricted to the following permitted uses:
(1) Cultivation of crops, including crops for bioenergy,
flowers, vegetables, foliage, fruits, forage, and
timber;
(2) Game and fish propagation;
(3) Raising of livestock, including poultry, bees, fish,
or other animal or aquatic life that are propagated
for economic or personal use;
(4) Farm dwellings, employee housing, farm buildings, or
activities or uses related to farming and animal
husbandry. For the purposes of this paragraph, "farm
dwelling" means a single-family dwelling located on
and accessory to a farm, including clusters of
single-family farm dwellings permitted within
agricultural parks developed by the State, or where
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 13
HIIMinUIMIMimiM

Page 14
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
agricultural activity provides income to the family
occupying the dwelling;
(5) Public institutions and buildings that are necessary
for agricultural practices;
(6) Public and private open area types of recreational
uses, including day camps, picnic grounds, parks, and
riding stables, but not including dragstrips,
airports, drive-in theaters, golf courses, golf
driving ranges, country clubs, and overnight camps;
provided that overnight camps in operation before
January 1, 1961, may be approved by special permit;
(7) Public, private, and quasi-public utility lines and
roadways, transformer stations, communications
equipment buildings, solid waste transfer stations,
IS major water storage tanks, and appurtenant small
buildings such as booster pumping stations, but not
including offices or yards for equipment, material,
vehicle storage, repair or maintenance, treatment
plants, corporation yards, or other similar
structures;
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 14

Page 15 3253
S.B. NO.
S.D.2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(8) Retention, restoration, rehabilitation, or improvement
of buildings or sites of historic or scenic interest;
(9) Agricultural-based commercial operations as described
in section 205-2(d)(15);
(10) Buildings and uses, including mills, storage, and
processing facilities, maintenance facilities,
photovoltaic, biogas, and other small-scale renewable
energy systems producing energy solely for use in the
agricultural activities of the fee or leasehold owner
of the property, and vehicle and equipment storage
areas that are normally considered directly accessory
to the above-mentioned uses and are permitted under
section 205-2(d);
(11) Agricultural parks;
(12) Plantation community subdivisions, which as used in
this chapter means an established subdivision or
cluster of employee housing, community buildings, and
agricultural support buildings on land currently or
formerly owned, leased, or operated by a sugar or
pineapple plantation; provided that the existing
structures may be used or rehabilitated for use, and
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 15
limillllHIillMIIIIWM

Page 16 3253
S.B. NO
S.D.2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
new employee housing and agricultural support
buildings may be allowed on land within the
subdivision as follows:
(A) The employee housing is occupied by employees or
former employees of the plantation who have a
property interest in the land;
(B) The employee housing units not owned by their
occupants shall be rented or leased at affordable
rates for agricultural workers; or
(C) The agricultural support buildings shall be
rented or leased to agricultural business
operators or agricultural support services;
(13) Agricultural tourism conducted on a working farm, or a
farming operation as defined in section 165-2, for the
enjoyment, education, or involvement of visitors;
provided that the agricultural tourism activity is
accessory and secondary to the principal agricultural
use and does not interfere with surrounding farm
operations; provided further that this paragraph shall
spply only to a county that has adopted ordinances
regulating agricultural tourism under section 205-5;
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 16
HliMIHIIIIHIIIIIIIIIIIIIIN

Page 17
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(14) Agricultural tourism activities, including overnight
accommodations of twenty-one days or less, for any one
stay within a county; provided that this paragraph
shall apply only to a county that includes at least
three islands and has adopted ordinances regulating
agricultural tourism activities pursuant to section
205-5; provided further that the agricultural tourism
activities coexist with a bona fide agricultural
activity. For the purposes of this paragraph, "bona
fide agricultural activity" means a farming operation
as defined in section 165-2;
(15) Wind energy facilities, including the appurtenances
associated with the production and transmission of
wind generated energy; provided that the wind energy
facilities and appurtenances are compatible with
agriculture uses and cause minimal adverse impact on
agricultural land;
(16) Biofuel processing facilities, including the
appurtenances associated with the production and
refining of biofuels that is normally considered
directly accessory and secondary to the growing of the
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 17

Page 18
S.B. NO. "’2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
energy feedstock; provided that biofuel processing
facilities and appurtenances do not adversely impact
agricultural land and other agricultural uses in the
vicinity.
For the purposes of this paragraph:
"Appurtenances" means operational infrastructure
of the appropriate type and scale for economic
commercial storage and distribution, and other similar
handling of feedstock, fuels, and other products of
biofuel processing facilities.
"Biofuel processing facility" means a facility
that produces liquid or gaseous fuels from organic
sources such as biomass crops, agricultural residues,
and oil crops, including palm, canola, soybean, and
waste cooking oils; grease; food wastes; and animal
residues and wastes that can be used to generate
energy;
(17) Agricultural-energy facilities, including
appurtenances necessary for an agricultural-energy
enterprise; provided that the primary activity of the
agricultural-energy enterprise is agricultural
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 18

Page 19
S.B. NO. 1^2
C.D. 1
activity. To be considered the primary activity of an
agricultural-energy enterprise, the total acreage
devoted to agricultural activity shall be no less than
ninety per cent of the total acreage of the
S agricultural-energy enterprise. The agricultural-
energy facility shall be limited to lands owned,
leased, licensed, or operated by the entity conducting
the agricultural activity.
As used in this paragraph:
"Agricultural activity" means any activity
described in paragraphs (1) to (3) of this subsection.
"Agricultural-energy enterprise" means an
enterprise that integrally incorporates an
agricultural activity with an agricultural-energy
facility.
"Agricultural-energy facility" means a facility
that generates, stores, or distributes renewable
energy as defined in section 269-91 or renewable fuel
including electrical or thermal energy or liquid or
gaseous fuels from products of agricultural activities
from agricultural lands located in the State.
2026-2493 SB3253 GDI SMA-l.docx 19

Page 20 S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
"Appurtenances" means operational infrastructure
of the appropriate type and scale for the economic
commercial generation, storage, distribution, and
other similar handling of energy, including equipment,
feedstock, fuels, and other products of agricultural-
energy facilities;
(18) Construction and operation of wireless communication
antennas, including small wireless facilities;
provided that, for the purposes of this paragraph,
"wireless communication antenna" means communications
equipment that is either freestanding or placed upon
or attached to an already existing structure and that
transmits and receives electromagnetic radio signals
used in the provision of ail types of wireless
communications services; provided further that "small
wireless facilities" shall have the same meaning as in
section 206N-2; provided further that nothing in this
paragraph shall be construed to permit the
construction of any new structure that is not deemed a
permitted use under this subsection;
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 20

Page 21
S.B. NO. ^3
C.D. 1
(19) Agricultural education programs conducted on a farming
operation as defined in section 165-2, for the
education and participation of the general public;
provided that the agricultural education programs are
accessory and secondary to the principal agricultural
use of the parcels or lots on which the agricultural
education programs are to occur and do not interfere
with surrounding farm operations. For the purposes of
this paragraph, "agricultural education programs"
means activities or events designed to promote
knowledge and understanding of agricultural activities
and practices conducted on a farming operation as
defined in section 165-2;
(20) Solar energy facilities that do not occupy more than
ten per cent of the acreage of the parcel, or twenty
acres of land, whichever is lesser or for which a
special use permit is granted pursuant to section
205-6; provided that this use shall not be permitted
on lands with soil classified by the land study
bureau's detailed land classification as overall
(master) productivity rating class A;
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 21
iwiiiiiHiiiiiniMMiigii

Page 22
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(21) Solar energy facilities on lands with soil classified
by the land study bureau's detailed land
classification as overall (master) productivity rating
B or C for which a special use permit is granted
pursuant to section 205-6; provided that:
(A) The area occupied by the solar energy facilities
is also made available for compatible
agricultural activities at a lease rate that is
at least fifty per cent below the fair market
rent for comparable properties;
(B) Proof of financial security to decommission the
facility is provided to the satisfaction of the
appropriate county planning commission before the
date of commencement of commercial generation;
IS and
(C) Solar energy facilities shall be decommissioned
at the owner's expense according to the following
requirements:
(i) Removal of all equipment related to the
solar energy facility within twelve months
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 22
wiMinMiffliiiBiiniini

Page 23
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
of the conclusion of operation or useful
life; and
(ii) Restoration of the disturbed earth to
substantially the same physical condition as
existed before the development of the solar
energy facility.
For the purposes of this paragraph, "agricultural
activities" means the activities described in
paragraphs (1) to (3);
(22) Geothermal resources exploration and geothermal
resources development, as defined under section 182-1;
(23) Hydroelectric facilities, including the appurtenances
associated with the production and transmission of
hydroelectric energy, subject to section 205-2;
provided that the hydroelectric facilities and their
appurtenances:
(A) Shall consist of a small hydropower facility as
defined by the United States Department of
Energy, including:
(i) Impoundment facilities using a dam to store
water in a reservoir;
2026-2493 SB3253 GDI SMA-l.docx :
IIMIIMMIIIHilllllWIIHIIII

Page 24
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(ii) A diversion or run-of-river facility that
channels a portion of a river through a
canal or channel; and
(iii) Pumped storage facilities that store energy
by pumping water uphill to a reservoir at
higher elevation from a reservoir at a lower
elevation to be released to turn a turbine
to generate electricity;
(B) Comply with the state water code, chapter 174C;
(C) Shall, if over five hundred kilowatts in
hydroelectric generating capacity, have the
approval of the commission on water resource
management, including a new instream flow
standard established for any new hydroelectric
facility; and
(D) Do not impact or impede the use of agricultural
land or the availability of surface or ground
water for all uses on all parcels that are served
by the ground water sources or streams for which
hydroelectric facilities are considered; [ee]
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 24
■iiMimiMiiiiHiin

Page 25
SB. NO.
-2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(24) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
composting and co-composting operations; provided that
operations that process their own green waste and do
not require permits from the department of health
shall use the finished composting product only on the
operation's own premises to minimize the potential
spread of invasive species[—]; or
(25) Operations of the Hawaii conservation sanctuary
authorized pursuant to section 195D- ."
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon July 1, 2026.
2026-2493 SB3253 CDl SMA-l.docx 25

S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 10th day of July ,2026

S.B. No. 3253, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
218-26

SB No. 3253, SD 2, HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives